apertium-mag.Lat-Dev.twol
Alphabet
 क ख ग घ ङ च छ ज झ ञ ट ठ ड ढ ण त थ द ध न प फ ब भ म ह र श ष स व
 य अ इ उ ए ऍ ओ ऐ ऑ औ आ ई ऊ ि ु े ॅ ो ॉ ै ौ ा ी ू

 %{A%}:अ %{A%}:0
 %{AA%}:आ %{AA%}:ा
 %{I%}:इ %{I%}:ि
 %{II%}:ई %{II%}:ी
 %{U%}:उ %{U%}:ु
 %{UU%}:ऊ %{UU%}:ू
 %{E%}:ए %{E%}:े
 %{EE%}:ऍ %{EE%}:ॅ
 %{AI%}:ऐ %{AI%}:ै
 %{O%}:ओ %{O%}:ो
 %{OO%}:ऑ %{OO%}:ॉ
 %{AU%}:औ %{AU%}:ौ
 %{R%}:ऋ %{R%}:ृ

;

! THIS SHOULD BE IN DEVANAGARI!

Sets

Vowel = अ इ उ ए ओ ऐ औ आ ई ऊ ि ु े ो ै ौ ा ी ू %{A%} %{AA%} %{I%} %{II%} %{U%} %{UU%} %{E%} %{AI%} %{O%} %{AU%} ;


Rules

 "short a is always this"
 %{A%}:अ <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;
 "long a is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{AA%}:आ <=> .#. _ ;
               Vowel: _ ;
 "short i is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{I%}:इ <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;
 "long i is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{II%}:ई <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;
 "short u is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{U%}:उ <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;
 "long u is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{UU%}:ऊ <=> .#. _ ;
               Vowel: _ ;
 "e is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{E%}:ए <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;
 "ee is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{EE%}:ऍ <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;
 "ai is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{AI%}:ऐ <=> .#. _ ;
               Vowel: _ ;
 "o is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{O%}:ओ <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;
 "oo is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{OO%}:ऑ <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;
 "au is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{AU%}:औ <=> .#. _ ;
               Vowel: _ ;
 "R is this at the beginning of a word or after a vowel"
 %{R%}:ऋ <=> Vowel: _ ;
              .#. _ ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
